en: Airworthiness approval basis: Experimental/Non-certified; OEM/Type Certificate (TC); Owner-produced part; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-associated; Standard part (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Other
el: Βάση έγκρισης αξιοπλοΐας: Πειραματικό/Μη πιστοποιημένο; OEM/Πιστοποιητικό τύπου (TC); Εξάρτημα κατασκευασμένο από τον ιδιοκτήτη; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Σχετιζόμενο με STC; Τυπικό εξάρτημα (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Άλλο
hu: Légialkalmassági jóváhagyás alapja: Kísérleti / nem tanúsított; OEM / Típusalkalmassági bizonyítvány (TC); Tulajdonos által gyártott alkatrész; PMA (Alkatrészgyártói engedély); STC-hez kapcsolódó; Szabványos alkatrész (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Műszaki szabványrendelet); Egyéb
da: Luftdygtighedens godkendelsesgrundlag: Eksperimentel/ikke-certificeret; OEM/typecertifikat (TC); Ejerproduceret del; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-associeret; Standarddel (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Andet
hr-HR: Osnova za odobrenje plovidbenosti: Eksperimentalno / nije certificirano; OEM / certifikat o tipu (TC); Dio koji je proizveo vlasnik; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Povezano sa STC-om; Standardni dio (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Ostalo
ru: Основание для утверждения летной годности: Экспериментальное/несертифицированное; OEM/Сертификат типа (TC); Деталь, изготовленная владельцем; PMA (Одобрение производителя деталей); Связанное с STC; Стандартная деталь (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Технический стандартный ордер); Другое
th: หลักเกณฑ์การอนุมัติความสมควรเดินอากาศ: ประเภททดลอง/ไม่ได้รับการรับรอง; OEM/ใบรับรองแบบ (TC); ชิ้นส่วนที่เจ้าของผลิตขึ้นเอง; PMA (การรับรองผู้ผลิตชิ้นส่วน); ที่เกี่ยวข้องกับ STC; ชิ้นส่วนมาตรฐาน (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (คำสั่งมาตรฐานทางเทคนิค); อื่นๆ
vi: Cơ sở phê duyệt khả năng bay: Thử nghiệm/không được chứng nhận; OEM/Chứng nhận chủng loại (TC); Phụ tùng do chủ sở hữu tự sản xuất; PMA (Phê duyệt nhà sản xuất phụ tùng); Liên quan đến STC; Phụ tùng tiêu chuẩn (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Yêu cầu kỹ thuật tiêu chuẩn); Khác
nb: Grunnlag for godkjenning av luftdyktighet: Eksperimentell / ikke sertifisert; OEM / typesertifikat (TC); Eierprodusert del; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-assosiert; Standarddel (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Annet
pl: Podstawa zatwierdzenia zdatności do lotu: Eksperymentalne/niecertyfikowane; OEM / Certyfikat typu (TC); Część wyprodukowana przez właściciela; PMA (Zatwierdzenie producenta części); Powiązane z STC; Część standardowa (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Inne
sl-SI: Podlaga za odobritev plovnosti: Eksperimentalno/necertificirano; OEM/Certifikat tipa (TC); Del, ki ga izdela lastnik; PMA (odobritev proizvajalca delov); Povezano s STC; Standardni del (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Drugo
fi: Lentokelpoisuuden hyväksyntäperusta: Kokeellinen / ei-sertifioitu; OEM / tyyppihyväksyntätodistus (TC); Omistajan valmistama osa; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-liitännäinen; Vakio-osa (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Muu
fr: Type d’homologation de navigabilité: Expérimental/Non certifié; OEM/Certificat de type (TC); Pièce produite par le propriétaire; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Associé au STC; Pièce standard (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Autre
de: Grundlage der Lufttüchtigkeitsgenehmigung: Experimentell/Nicht zertifiziert; OEM/Musterzulassung (TC); Vom Eigentümer hergestelltes Teil; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-assoziiert; Normteil (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Sonstige
ko: 감항성 승인 기준: 실험용/미인증; OEM/형식 증명(TC); 소유자 제작 부품; PMA(부품 제조자 승인); STC 관련; 표준 부품(AN/MS/NAS); TSO(기술 표준품); 기타
pt-BR: Base de aprovação de aeronavegabilidade: Experimental/Não certificado; OEM/Certificado de Tipo (TC); Peça produzida pelo proprietário; PMA (Aprovação de Fabricante de Peças); Associado a STC; Peça padrão (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Ordem de Padrão Técnico); Outro
sv: Underlag för godkännande av flygduglighet: Experimentell/icke-certifierad; OEM/Typcertifikat (TC); Ägarproducerad del; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-associerad; Standarddel (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Annan
ro-RO: Bază pentru aprobarea privind navigabilitatea: Experimental/necertificat; OEM/Certificat de tip (TC); Piesă produsă de proprietar; PMA (Aprobarea producătorului de piese); Asociat cu STC; Piesă standard (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Ordin tehnic standard); Altele
nl: Basis luchtwaardigheidsgoedkeuring: Experimenteel/Niet-gecertificeerd; OEM/Typecertificaat (TC); Door eigenaar geproduceerd onderdeel; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); STC-geassocieerd; Standaardonderdeel (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Overig
it: base di approvazione dell'aeronavigabilità: Sperimentale/non certificato; OEM/Certificato di omologazione (TC); Parte prodotta dal proprietario; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Associato a STC; Parte standard (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Altro
ja: 耐空性承認基準: 実験用/非認定; OEM/型式証明 (TC); 所有者製造部品; PMA (部品製造承認); STC関連; 標準部品 (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (技術標準品承認); その他
zh-TW: 適航核准依據: 實驗性/未認證; OEM/型號檢定證 (TC); 擁有者自製零件; PMA (零組件製造商核准); STC 相關; 標準零件 (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (技術標準規定); 其他
bg-BG: Основание за одобрение на летателна годност: Експериментално/Несертифицирано; OEM/Типов сертификат (TC); Част, произведена от собственика; PMA (Одобрение на производител на части); Свързано със STC; Стандартна част (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Технически стандарт); Друго
tr: Uçuşa elverişlilik onayı esasları: Deneysel/Sertifikalı olmayan; OEM/Tip Sertifikası (TC); Sahibi tarafından üretilen parça; PMA (Parça Üretici Onayı); STC ile ilişkili; Standart parça (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Teknik Standart Emri); Diğer
es: Base de aprobación de aeronavegabilidad: Experimental/no certificado; OEM/certificado de tipo (TC); Pieza producida por el propietario; PMA (aprobación de fabricante de piezas); Asociado a STC; Pieza estándar (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (orden de estándar técnico); Otro
lt-LT: Tinkamumo skraidyti patvirtinimo pagrindas: Eksperimentinis / nesertifikuotas; OEM / tipo sertifikatas (TC); Savininko pagaminta dalis; PMA (dalių gamintojo patvirtinimas); Susietas su STC; Standartinė dalis (AN / MS / NAS); TSO (techninio standarto nurodymas); Kita
pt-PT: Base de aprovação de aeronavegabilidade: Experimental/não certificado; OEM/certificado de tipo (TC); Peça produzida pelo proprietário; PMA (aprovação do fabricante de peças); Associado a STC; Peça padrão (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Outro
zh-CN: 适航批准依据: 实验/未经认证; OEM/型号合格证 (TC); 所有者自制零件; PMA（零部件制造人批准书）; STC（补充型号合格证）关联; 标准件 (AN/MS/NAS); TSO（技术标准规定）; 其他
cs: Základ pro schválení letové způsobilosti: Experimentální / necertifikováno; OEM / typové osvědčení (TC); Díl vyrobený majitelem; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Související se STC; Standardní díl (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Jiné
sk-SK: Základ pre schválenie letovej spôsobilosti: Experimentálne/necertifikované; OEM/typové osvedčenie (TC); Diel vyrobený vlastníkom; PMA (Parts Manufacturer Approval); Súvisiace so STC; Štandardný diel (AN/MS/NAS); TSO (Technical Standard Order); Iný